Massachusetts, session 194th, H3889.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Section 5 of chapter 115 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as
appearing in the most recent edition, is hereby amended by striking out the current rates of
benefits provided to veterans and inserting in place thereof the following provisions:-
1. The amount of financial assistance provided to eligible veterans shall be increased by
25% over the current rate of benefits.
2. The Massachusetts Executive Office of Veterans' Services shall annually review the
cost of living and adjust the benefit rates accordingly to ensure veterans' benefits keep pace with
inflation.
(b) Section 5A of chapter 115 of the Massachusetts General Laws is further amended by
adding the following:-
of 2

(1) Upon the death of an eligible veteran, the surviving spouse shall continue to receive
the same financial assistance benefits provided under Chapter 115 for a period of 12 months
following the death of the veteran.
(2) After the initial 12-month period, the surviving spouse shall continue to receive
financial assistance at 75% of the veteran’s benefit rate, provided the spouse remains unmarried
and continues to meet the eligibility criteria set forth by the Department of Veterans' Services.
(3) In the event of remarriage, benefits shall cease at the time of remarriage.
(4) The Executive Office of Veterans' Services shall establish guidelines to ensure a
seamless transition of benefits from the veteran to the surviving spouse, including application
procedures and eligibility verification processes.
SECTION 2. (a) The Commonwealth shall allocate the necessary funds to the Executive
Office of Veterans' Services to implement the increased benefits and to administer the extension
of benefits to surviving spouses.
(b) The Executive Office of Veterans' Services shall work in coordination with local
veterans’ agents to ensure eligible veterans and their surviving spouses are informed of the
changes to Chapter 115 benefits and the process for applying for and receiving benefits.
SECTION 3. (a) The Executive Office of Veterans' Services shall submit a report to the
General Court within 18 months of the enactment of this act, detailing the financial impact of the
increased benefits and the extension of benefits to surviving spouses. The report shall include
recommendations for any further legislative action needed to ensure the sustainability and
effectiveness of the Chapter 115 benefits program.
of 2